Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 7 Arkansas Crime Commission
12-8-119. Police training school.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police may establish, maintain, and conduct a police training school and may admit to the training school police officers and judicial officers of the various political subdivisions of the State of Arkansas.

The director may prescribe all rules necessary for the proper functioning and operating of the school.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a).

Cross References. Law Enforcement Training Academy, §12-9-201 et seq.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a); substituted “division” for “department” in (a) and (b); and substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police Fund” for “Department of Arkansas State Police Fund” in (b).

Cross References. Department of Arkansas State Police Fund, §19-6-404.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit uniforms or commercial concerns from reproducing these items for division use, nor the public display of the uniform, patch, or logo when it relates to official governmental business.

Amendments. The 2019 amendmentsubstituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a) and (b); and substituted “division” for “department” in (c).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the replacement of motor vehicles by the Department of Arkansas State Police, was repealed by Acts 2003, No. 1609, § 17. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 1154, § 11.

A.C.R.C. Notes. This section was specifically repealed by Acts 2005, No. 194, § 1. Pursuant to Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 119, the amendments to this section by Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 23 are superseded by Acts 2005, No. 194, § 1.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning accepting surplus United States Department of Defense property, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 194, § 1. The section was derived from the following sources: Acts 1995, No. 462, § 1; 2001, No. 1697, § 8.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning replacement of motor vehicles, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 1422, § 16. The section was derived from Acts 1997, No. 853, § 13.

A city of the second class or incorporated town shall not be required to provide matching funds to receive a grant under this section.

If the Division of Arkansas State Police awards a grant to a city of the second class or incorporated town under this section, the division shall pay the grant funds for the purchase of a used vehicle directly to the Marketing and Redistribution Section within the Office of State Procurement.

Funds from a grant received under this section shall not be used to pay sales tax for a used vehicle purchased from the Marketing and Redistribution Section within the Office of State Procurement.

The awarding of grants under this section is contingent on the appropriation and availability of funding for the program.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 82, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that the creation of the Development and Enhancement Fund is necessary to provide a mechanism to disburse funds for:

“(1)Various construction and improvement projects;

“(2)Unforeseen needs;

“(3)Funding deficiencies; and

“(4)The completion of projects previously funded by the General Assembly”.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 82 added “including the Development and Enhancement Fund” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a) and (e); substituted “division” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (c)(1) and (e); and deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” at the end of (e).

Cross References. Retirement of State Police, §24-6-201 et seq.

Scholarships for children of law enforcement officers, §6-82-501 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1945, No. 231, § 28: Mar. 20, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “It having been ascertained and determined by the General Assembly that on account of the widespread disregard for the traffic laws of the state and the rules and regulations governing the same as a result of the establishment of many large war plants and military posts in the State of Arkansas, together with the enormous increase of traffic caused by the war, which has created conditions at and around such war plants and military posts creating a condition upon the highways of this state which, in order to efficiently operate the Department of Arkansas State Police, make it necessary that the same be departmentalized and organized in such manner that the personnel of said department can be assigned and directed in a more efficient manner and because of the hazards to life and limb as a result of the disregard for the laws making such conditions dangerous to the health, peace, and safety of the people of Arkansas an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the peace, health, and safety of the citizens of this state and for the traveling public, this act shall take effect and be in full force after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1959, No. 91, § 5: Feb. 24, 1959. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that under the present law there is no adequate protection or compensation for the families and dependents of members of the State Police and its divisions who have lost their lives in the course of employment, and that it is urgent that such protection and compensation be provided. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 636, § 3: July 1, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventieth General Assembly that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two-year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1975 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriation in this act is provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1975 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and providing of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1975.”

Acts 1981, No. 12, § 4: Feb. 2, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is currently no law specifically authorizing the State Police Commission to award a retiring officer the handgun carried by the officer during his service and there has been some concern regarding the commission's practice of making such awards; that the award of a handgun to a retiring officer is effective in maintaining good morale among the officers of the State Police and thereby promotes effective and efficient law enforcement; that this act is designed to give specific authority to the commission to make such awards and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 700, § 3: Mar. 24, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that present law requires the State Police Commission to hear within thirty (30) days from the date of filing an appeal, all appeals from state policemen regarding disciplinary actions taken by the Director of the State Police; that the commission meets only once a month and therefore the current law places an undue burden on the commission; and that this act is necessary to grant the commission a reasonable time within which to hear such appeals. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 951, § 5: July 1, 1985.

Acts 1993, No. 508, § 22: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1993 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1993 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 2003, No. 1609, § 24: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2003 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2003 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 1007, § 23: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2019 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2019 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2019”.

Members of the Arkansas State Police are state officers and therefore can be sued only in the official residence of the Arkansas State Police, which is Pulaski County. Downey v. Toler, 214 Ark. 334, 216 S.W.2d 60 (1948).

Publisher's Notes. In addition to enacting the general and permanent provisions codified in this section, Acts 1945, No. 231, § 5, provided that all members of the Department of Arkansas State Police who held the rank of captain, lieutenant, sergeant, or patrolman on December 1, 1944, would be commissioned by the director immediately after the act became effective (March 20, 1945), with the same rank they held on December 1, 1944, and that they would have full credit under the provisions of the act pertaining to retirement and disability benefits and civil service for service performed as a member of the Arkansas State Police or Arkansas State Rangers.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b) and (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” twice in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b), (c), and (e)(2).

Where unsuccessful applicant for position with Arkansas State Police had dismal employment history and unfavorable credit history, a prima facie case of race discrimination could not stand absent evidence that the police department's personnel actions were a pretext for racial discrimination. Ward v. Ark. State Police, 539 F. Supp. 1116 (E.D. Ark. 1982), aff'd, 714 F.2d 62 (8th Cir. 1983).

Cited: Seal v. Pryor, 504 F. Supp. 599 (E.D. Ark. 1980).

Has been convicted of a felony in any state or federal court;

Is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing a weapon; or

Is known to be a person of immoral character.

Where unsuccessful applicant for position with Arkansas State Police had dismal employment history and unfavorable credit history, a prima facie case of race discrimination could not stand absent evidence that the police department's personnel actions were a pretext for racial discrimination. Ward v. Ark. State Police, 539 F. Supp. 1116 (E.D. Ark. 1982), aff'd, 714 F.2d 62 (8th Cir. 1983).

Cited: Seal v. Pryor, 504 F. Supp. 599 (E.D. Ark. 1980).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2011, No. 14, § 2, provided: “This act does not apply to a police officer of the Department of Arkansas State Police serving a probationary period on the effective date of this act.”

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted the subdivision (1) and (2) designations in (a); substituted “from his or her date of hire” for “after completion of the department recruit academy and prescribed field training program and” in present (a)(1); substituted “A probationer” for “during that time” in present (a)(2); and substituted “already” for “theretofore” in (b).

The 2011 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “police officer” for “member” and “eighteen (18) months” for “one (1) year”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a)(1) and (a)(2).

Cited: Seal v. Pryor, 504 F. Supp. 599 (E.D. Ark. 1980).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a) and (b); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b), (c)(1), and (d)(1).

Where a dismissed state trooper sought an injunction to prevent the State Police Commission from barring the press from his hearing, it was actually a suit for mandamus rather than a petition for injunctive relief. Ark. State Police Comm'n v. Davidson, 252 Ark. 137, 477 S.W.2d 852 (1972).

The Freedom of Information Act, §25-19-101 et seq., required that the hearing of testimony, as distinguished from a discussion or consideration by the State Police Commission, must be held in public. Ark. State Police Comm'n v. Davidson, 253 Ark. 1090, 490 S.W.2d 788 (1973).

Cited: Seal v. Pryor, 504 F. Supp. 599 (E.D. Ark. 1980).

This section is not substantially overbroad or impermissibly vague and is, therefore, constitutional on its face. Wicker v. Goodwin, 813 F. Supp. 676 (E.D. Ark. 1992) (decided under former version of section).

Where the Governor had issued a directive informing state employees of their right to participate in political activities while off duty and not using state equipment, and this directive was posted in state police troop headquarters, discipline of troopers for off duty activities violated their rights guaranteed under the Due Process Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment. Wicker v. Goodwin, 813 F. Supp. 676 (E.D. Ark. 1992) (decided under former version of section).

This section is not so vague that people of common intelligence must necessarily guess at its meaning; indeed, whatever problems may exist with this section, it is impractical to suggest that it fails to give adequate warning of the types of prohibited activities or the consequences for engaging in such. Wicker v. Goodwin, 813 F. Supp. 676 (E.D. Ark. 1992) (decided under former version of section).

This section is not substantially overbroad or impermissibly vague and is, therefore, constitutional on its face; however, under certain circumstances, disciplinary action taken against troopers for violation of this section violated troopers' rights guaranteed under the Due Process Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment. Wicker v. Goodwin, 813 F. Supp. 676 (E.D. Ark. 1992) (decided under former version of section).

Subsections (d) through (f) of this section indicate that political activity, even during off duty hours, is prohibited. Wicker v. Goodwin, 813 F. Supp. 676 (E.D. Ark. 1992) (decided under former version of section).

The restrictions imposed by this section favor no particular party, group, or points of view, but apply equally to all types of political activities therein described. Wicker v. Goodwin, 813 F. Supp. 676 (E.D. Ark. 1992)(decided under former version of section).

This section is penal in nature, in that it makes no provision for a trooper to be merely suspended or fined, but states that violation of the statute is sufficient for removal. Wicker v. Goodwin, 813 F. Supp. 676 (E.D. Ark. 1992) (decided under former version of section).

This section serves several valid and important interests, among those being to guarantee troopers' job security, free from the vicissitudes of the election process; to avoid the appearance of political partisanship on the part of the Arkansas State Police; and to promote a harmonious working relationship between the State Police, citizens, and political officials throughout the State. Wicker v. Goodwin, 813 F. Supp. 676 (E.D. Ark. 1992) (decided under former version of section).

Until now it has evidently been the judgment of Arkansas' legislature, executive, and citizens that participation in political campaigns and related activities by Arkansas State Troopers should be restricted. Wicker v. Goodwin, 813 F. Supp. 676 (E.D. Ark. 1992) (decided under former version of section).

A state trooper is often the most conspicuous representative of the state government to a large percentage of the population, particularly those residing in rural communities who may view the trooper as a symbol of stability and authority; accordingly, in balancing the interests of the plaintiffs and the interest of the State under this section, the Court found the balance weighed in favor of the State. Wicker v. Goodwin, 813 F. Supp. 676 (E.D. Ark. 1992) (decided under former version of section).

Under customary procedure, complaints alleging violations of this section would be reviewed by the State Police Director under two circumstances: one situation occurs when the troop captain determines the complaint cannot be handled at troop level; the other situation occurs when an officer is unhappy with the decision of the troop captain or the staff disciplinary board and appeals the decision directly to the director. Wicker v. Goodwin, 813 F. Supp. 676 (E.D. Ark. 1992) (decided under former version of section).

Cited: Seal v. Pryor, 504 F. Supp. 599 (E.D. Ark. 1980).

Publisher's Notes. Sections 12-8-206 — 12-8-208, concerning troopers first class, corporals, and state police operators, were repealed by Acts 2001, No. 1697, §§ 13-15. Section 12-8-209, concerning salaries, expenses, and allowances for police officers, was repealed by Acts 2003, No. 1609, § 21. The sections were derived from the following sources:

12-8-206. Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1017, § 13; 1985, No. 836, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-430.1; Acts 1987, No. 1037, § 9; 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 285, § 9.

12-8-207. Acts 1981, No. 540, § 17; 1985, No. 836, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-421.1; Acts 1987, No. 1037, § 9; 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 285, § 9.

12-8-208. Acts 1965, No. 29, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-433.

12-8-209. Acts 1945, No. 231, § 6; 1981, No. 540, § 7; 1985, No. 519, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-406, 40-406.1; Acts 1991, No. 1099, § 17; 1999, No. 1332, § 1; 1999, No. 1378, § 14; 2001, No. 1697, § 16.

A full-time employee of the division as defined in the plan document for the Arkansas State Police Employee Health Plan; and

Qualified to enroll in the health benefit plan offered by the division; and

“Eligible retiree” means an employee who:

Retires under the division's formal retirement plan;

Is eligible to continue to participate in the retirement plan upon retirement as defined in the plan document for the Arkansas State Police Employee Health Plan; and

Is qualified to enroll in the health benefit plan offered by the division.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 870, § 19, provided:

“UNIFORM EMPLOYEE HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM REPORTING. The Department of Arkansas State Police shall report monthly to the Governor, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee regarding the activity and condition for the uniformed employee health insurance plan. The report shall include, but not limited to, the beginning reserve fund balance, contributions made during the month, claims paid, and the ending fund balance of the month. In the event it is determined that the cost to adequately maintain the uniform employee health insurance plan is not feasible within the existing resources available to the department, the 90th General Assembly shall study the feasibility and desirability of discontinuing the self-insurance program and instead provide medical and hospital insurance to uniform employees through the public employees insurance program.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2016, No. 265, § 19, provided: “UNIFORM EMPLOYEE HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM REPORTING. The Department of Arkansas State Police shall report monthly to the Governor, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee regarding the activity and condition for the uniformed employee health insurance plan. The report shall include, but not limited to, the beginning reserve fund balance, contributions made during the month, claims paid, and the ending fund balance of the month. In the event it is determined that the cost to adequately maintain the uniform employee health insurance plan is not feasible within the existing resources available to the department, the 90th General Assembly shall study the feasibility and desirability of discontinuing the self-insurance program and instead provide medical and hospital insurance to uniform employees through the public employees insurance program.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Acts 2017, No. 1026, §17, provided: “UNIFORM EMPLOYEE HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM REPORTING. The Department of Arkansas State Police shall report monthly to the Governor, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee regarding the activity and condition for the uniformed employee health insurance plan. The report shall include, but not limited to, the beginning reserve fund balance, contributions made during the month, claims paid, and the ending fund balance of the month. In the event it is determined that the cost to adequately maintain the uniform employee health insurance plan is not feasible within the existing resources available to the department, the 91st General Assembly shall study the feasibility and desirability of discontinuing the self-insurance program and instead provide medical and hospital insurance to uniform employees through the public employees insurance program.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2017 through June 30, 2018.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “shall” for “is authorized and directed to” and “eligible” for uniformed”; inserted “all or a portion of” in (a)(2); in (b), substituted “may” for “is authorized to” following “The department”, “eligible employees” for “uniformed personnel”, and “pay all or a portion of” for “to pay”;in (c), deleted “therefor” following “Commission”, substituted “eligible” for “uniformed” following “coverage for”, and substituted “eligible employees” for “uniformed personnel”; in (d), substituted “eligible retirees” for “uniformed personnel”, “21-5-411” for “21-5-412”, and “State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program” for “state employees' hospitalization and medical insurance program”; and added (e).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning liability insurance, was repealed by Acts 2003, No. 1041, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1971, No. 332, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-435.

(1)(A)When any police officer of the Department of Arkansas State Police shall have lost his or her life in the course of employment, then upon satisfactory proof of that fact made to the Arkansas State Police Commission, a death benefit in the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) shall be paid to the spouse of the deceased officer.

In case no spouse survives the officer, the death benefit shall be distributed equally among the officer's children.

The sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) shall be paid from the Department of Arkansas State Police Fund.

Cross References. Department of Arkansas State Police Fund, §19-6-404.

Payment to dependents of police officers killed in the line of duty, §21-5-701 et seq.

Survivor's benefits for survivors of officers killed in line of duty while not member of retirement system, §24-6-218.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Arkansas Law Survey, Baker, Workers' Compensation, 9 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 213.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a),substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” and “division” for “department”; substituted “Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police” for “director of the department” in (b); and substituted “director” for “Director of the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (c).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 155, § 2, provided: “The act applies retroactively to a Department of Arkansas State Police officer who retired from service or died while employed by the department on or after January 1, 2008, but before the effective date of this act.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote (b).

As used in this section, “in the course of employment” means at any time when an officer is on duty as a police officer or is performing an act ordinarily performed by a police officer although the officer is not actually on duty at the time.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to limit or extinguish the right of any officer or the officer's survivors to any other benefits provided by law.

Such motorcycles, automobiles, and other vehicles, equipment, and supplies as may be necessary for the proper and efficient operation of the Division of Arkansas State Police and as may be necessary for the proper enforcement of this chapter shall be furnished to the officers and patrol personnel by the division.

The officers and patrol personnel shall wear and display upon their person a metal badge or other insignia as the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall require, bearing the words “Arkansas State Police”.

All such patrol personnel and officers shall wear such uniforms at such times and places as shall be designated and required by the director.

When a Department of Arkansas State Police officer retires from service or dies while still employed with the department, in recognition of and appreciation for the service of the retiring or deceased officer, the Arkansas State Police Commission may award the pistol carried by the officer at the time of his or her death or retirement from service to:

When a department officer retires from service or dies while still employed with the department, in recognition of and appreciation for the service of the retiring or deceased officer, the commission may allow the purchase of the shotgun used by the officer while on duty at the time of his or her death or retirement from service at fair market value as determined by the commission by:

In the event that sufficient revenues in the judgment of the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police exist, the Division of Arkansas State Police is authorized to make additional salary payments from such funds to those employees who have attained law enforcement certification above the basic certificate level, as defined by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training.

It is the intent of this section that such payment shall be optional, at the discretion of the director, dependent on sufficient revenues, and shall not be implemented using funds specifically set aside for other programs within the division.

(1)Employees shall be eligible for all or a portion of additional salary payments scheduled as follows:

General certificate — three hundred dollars ($300) annually;

Intermediate certificate — six hundred dollars ($600) annually;

Advanced certificate — nine hundred dollars ($900) annually; and

Senior certificate — one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) annually.

Payment of the funds may be made monthly, quarterly, semiannually, or annually depending upon the availability of revenues and shall be restricted to the following classifications:

Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police;

Arkansas State Police lieutenant colonel;

Arkansas State Police major;

Arkansas State Police captain;

Arkansas State Police lieutenant;

Arkansas State Police sergeant;

Arkansas State Police corporal;

Arkansas State Police trooper, first class; and

Arkansas State Police trooper.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment deleted (c)(2)(J) and (c)(2)(K).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” twice in (a) and in (c)(2)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

Payments made under this section shall be considered part of the employee's regular income and subject to all applicable withholding required by law.

Should additional general revenue funds become available to the Division of Arkansas State Police, as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the division shall implement a salary administration grid for the following uniformed commissioned officer classifications:

The salary administration grid established under this section shall set the entry pay level for each of the classifications listed in subsection (a) of this section at five percent (5%) above the entry pay level of the assigned grade under the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1985, No. 817, § 11: Apr. 4, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “The Seventy-Fifth General Assembly hereby finds and declares the present communications equipment for the department is not adequate and that there is an urgent need that modern communications equipment be acquired in order that the department may continue to carry out its law enforcement responsibilities in an effective manner. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be effective upon its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-417; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 848; 2019, No. 910, § 5777.

12-8-120. Background investigations.

The Division of Arkansas State Police is authorized to charge a fee, not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00), for each background investigation requested of and conducted by the division.

The background investigation fee shall be collected by the division and deposited into the State Treasury as special revenue to the credit of the Division of Arkansas State Police Fund.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 508, § 14; 2001, No. 1697, § 7; 2019, No. 910, § 5778.

12-8-121. Use of state uniform, patch, or logo prohibited.

It shall be prohibited for any law enforcement agency, private security firm, corporation, partnership, or individual to wear a uniform in the same design and specific color scheme as the Division of Arkansas State Police.

No law enforcement agency, private security firm, corporation, partnership, or individual may use the Arkansas State Police uniform or patch, nor may the Arkansas State Police logo or the terms “Arkansas State Police”, “Arkansas State Trooper”, or “Arkansas State Troopers” be used or otherwise displayed for the endorsement of any product, business, or purpose without the express written permission of the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 935, §§ 1-3; 2001, No. 1094, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5779.

12-8-122. [Repealed.]

12-8-124. [Repealed.]

There is created the “Small Municipality Law Enforcement Vehicle Grant Program”, to be administered by the Division of Arkansas State Police with funding from the General Improvement Fund or its successor fund or fund accounts, including the Development and Enhancement Fund.

(1)The program may provide grants to cities of the second class as determined under §14-37-103 or incorporated towns as determined under §14-37-103 for the purpose of purchasing used vehicles from the Marketing and Redistribution Section within the Office of State Procurement.

Vehicles purchased under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be used by law enforcement agencies of the city of the second class or incorporated town receiving the grant.

(1)The division shall promulgate rules necessary for the implementation of the program.

The rules shall include:

The procedure for making an application for a grant;

The selection criteria for a grant;

The limitations on use of grant money; and

A procedure to provide for accountability of grant recipients.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1237, § 1; 2019, No. 82, § 5; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5780-5782.

Subchapter 2

— Police Officers

12-8-201. Members of police force — Selection.

The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall appoint all members of the police force, subject to approval of the Arkansas State Police Commission, and the director shall select the clerical and stenographic force of the Division of Arkansas State Police.

The commission shall promulgate rules setting forth the minimum qualifications for employment as a division police officer and prescribing the manner of examination of applicants for the position.

The director shall receive all applications for positions as division officers and submit them to the commission for examination as to the physical fitness and mental qualifications of the applicants and for such other examinations as provided for by the commission's rules.

All applications and examinations shall be in writing and shall be kept as a permanent file by the commission for not less than five (5) years.

(1)A list containing the names of all applicants who possess the necessary qualifications as determined by the commission shall be certified to the director.

From this list, the director shall make the final selection for the appointments, and any vacancy occurring in the division shall be filled from this list.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, §§ 5, 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-405, 42-406; Acts 2001, No. 1697, § 9; 2019, No. 315, § 849; 2019, No. 910, §§
5783, 5784.

12-8-202. Qualifications of members.

(1)(A)All applicants for positions as police officers of the Department of Arkansas State Police shall be citizens of the United States.

However, the applicants must become citizens of the State of Arkansas in order to commence employment.

Any applicant shall be employed strictly upon an efficiency basis irrespective of race, gender, religion, or political affiliation.

No person shall be eligible for a position as a commissioned member of the department who:

Police officers of the department shall not be appointed as patronage or political favor.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-406; Acts 1997, No. 380, § 1; 2001, No. 1697, § 10.

12-8-203. Probationary period.

(1)Each person who is selected as a police officer of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall be a probationer for a period of eighteen (18) months from his or her date of hire.

A probationer may be discharged by the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police with the approval of the Arkansas State Police Commission with or without cause.

The probationary period shall not apply to a person who has already served a probationary period.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, § 6; 1981, No. 700, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-406; Acts 2001, No. 1697, § 11; 2003, No. 1041, § 1; 2005, No. 667, § 1; 2011, No. 14, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5785.